lt-LT: Pupelių veislė: Juodaakės pupuolės; Pupos; Edamame; Žaliosios pupelės; Raudonžiedės pupelės; Šparaginės pupelės; Geltonosios šparaginės pupelės; Sparnuotosios pupuolės; Kininės pupuolės; Kita
fr: Variété de haricots: Haricots à œil noir; Fèves; Edamame; Haricots verts; Haricots d’Espagne; Haricots filets; Haricots beurre; Pois carrés; Haricots kilométriques; Autre
sv: Bönsort: Svartögda bönor; Bondbönor; Edamame; Gröna bönor; Blomsterbönor; Haricots verts; Vaxbönor; Vingbönor; Sparrisbönor; Övrigt
cs: Odrůda fazolí: Fazole černé oko; Bob obecný; Edamame; Zelené fazolky; Fazol šarlatový; Fazolové lusky; Žluté fazolky; Psofokarpus; Fazole vigna; Jiné
bg-BG: Сорт боб: Боб черно око; Бакла; Едамаме; Зелен боб; Увивен боб; Зелен фасул; Жълт фасул; Крилат фасул; Дълъг фасул; Друго
sk-SK: Odroda fazule: Fazuľa čierne oko; Bôb obyčajný; Edamame; Zelená fazuľka; Fazuľa šarlátová; Fazuľové struky; Žltá fazuľka; Okrídlená fazuľa; Fazuľa dlhostruková; Iné
tr: Fasulye çeşidi: Börülce; Bakla; Edamame; Taze fasulye; Sırık fasulyesi; Çalı fasulyesi; Balmumu fasulyesi; Kanatlı fasulye; Börülce (uzun); Diğer
ro-RO: Soiul de fasole: Fasole ochi negri; Bob; Edamame; Fasole verde; Fasole urcătoare; Fasole păstăi; Fasole galbenă; Fasole cu aripioare; Fasole la metru; Altele
th: พันธุ์ถั่ว: ถั่วตาดำ; ถั่วปากอ้า; ถั่วแระญี่ปุ่น; ถั่วแขก; ถั่วพูฝรั่ง; ถั่วฝักยาว; ถั่วแวกซ์บีน; ถั่วพู; ถั่วฝักยาว; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Sorta graha: Crnooki grah; Bob; Edamame; Mahune; Grah tetovac; Zelene mahune; Žute mahune; Krilati grah; Dugi grah; Ostalo
ja: 豆の種類: ブラックアイドピーズ; そら豆; 枝豆; さやいんげん; ランナービーンズ; インゲン豆; ワックスビーンズ; シカクマメ; ジュウロクササゲ; その他
vi: Loại đậu: Đậu mắt đen; Đậu tằm; Đậu edamame; Đậu cô ve; Đậu ván; Đậu đũa; Đậu sáp; Đậu rồng; Đậu đũa; Khác
pt-BR: Variedade de feijão: Feijão-fradinho; Favas; Edamame; Vagem; Feijão-da-espanha; Feijão-verde; Vagem amarela; Feijão-alado; Feijão-de-metro; Outros
zh-CN: 豆类品种: 黑眼豆; 蚕豆; 毛豆; 四季豆; 红花菜豆; 豆角; 蜡豆; 四棱豆; 豇豆; 其他
pt-PT: Variedade de feijão: Feijão-frade; Favas; Edamame; Feijão-verde; Feijoca; Vagens; Feijão-manteiga; Feijão-alado; Feijão-chicote; Outro
ko: 콩 품종: 블랙아이드피; 잠두콩; 에다마메; 그린빈; 런너빈; 스트링빈; 왁스빈; 윙빈; 줄강낭콩; 기타
da: Bønnevariant: Black-eyed peas; Hestebønner; Edamame; Grønne bønner; Pralbønner; Brækbønner; Voksbønner; Vingebønner; Slangebønner; Anden
it: Varietà di fagiolo: Fagioli dall’occhio; Fave; Edamame; Fagiolini; Fagioli rampicanti; Fagiolini; Fagiolini burro; Fagioli alati; Fagioli stringa; Altro
es: Variedad de frijoles: Frijoles carita; Habas; Edamame; Judías verdes; Frijoles escarlata; Ejotes; Judías cera; Frijoles alados; Frijoles espárrago; Otro
en: Bean variety: Black-eyed peas; Broad beans; Edamame; Green beans; Runner beans; String beans; Wax beans; Winged beans; Yardlong beans; Other
nb: Bønnevariant: Svartøyebønner; Bondebønner; Edamame; Grønne bønner; Prydbønner; Brekkbønner; Voksbønner; Vingebønner; Meterbønner; Annet
fi: Papulajike: Mustasilmäpavut; Härkäpavut; Edamame-pavut; Vihreät pavut; Ruusupavut; Taitepavut; Vahapavut; Siipipavut; Pitkäpavut; Muu
ru: Сорт фасоли: Черноглазый горох; Конские бобы; Эдамаме; Зеленая фасоль; Многоцветковая фасоль; Стручковая фасоль; Восковая фасоль; Крылатые бобы; Китайская вигна; Другое
nl: Bonenvariëteit: Zwartogenbonen; Tuinbonen; Edamame; Sperziebonen; Pronkbonen; Sperziebonen; Boterbonen; Vleugelbonen; Kousenband; Overige
sl-SI: Vrsta fižola: Kravji grah; Bob; Edamame; Stročji fižol; Turški fižol; Stročji fižol; Rumeni stročji fižol; Krilati fižol; Metrski fižol; Drugo
zh-TW: 豆類品種: 黑眼豆; 蠶豆; 毛豆; 四季豆; 紅花菜豆; 敏豆; 蠟豆; 翼豆; 豇豆; 其他
de: Bohnensorte: Schwarzaugenbohnen; Dicke Bohnen; Edamame; Grüne Bohnen; Feuerbohnen; Schnittbohnen; Wachsbohnen; Flügelbohnen; Spargelbohnen; Sonstige
hu: Bab változat: Feketeszemű bab; Lóbab; Edamame; Zöldbab; Tűzbab; Ceruzabab; Vajbab; Szárnyasbab; Kígyóbab; Egyéb
pl: Odmiana fasoli: Fasola „czarne oczko”; Bób; Edamame; Fasolka szparagowa; Fasola wielokwiatowa; Fasolka szparagowa; Fasolka szparagowa żółta; Fasolnik skrzydlaty; Fasolnik chiński; Inne
el: Ποικιλία φασολιών: Μαυρομάτικα; Κουκιά; Ενταμάμε; Πράσινα φασόλια; Φασόλια γίγαντες; Αμπελοφάσουλα; Κίτρινα φασολάκια; Φτερωτά φασόλια; Μακρόκαρπα φασόλια; Άλλο